Utah statutes.
62A-11-321.   Posting bond or security for payment of support debt -- Procedure.

(1)  The office shall, or an obligee may, petition the court for an order requiring an obligor to post a bond or provide other security for the payment of a support debt, if the office or an obligee determines that action is appropriate, and if the payments are more than 90 days delinquent.  The office shall establish rules for determining when it shall seek an order for bond or other security.

(2)  When the office or an obligee petitions the court under this section, it shall give written notice to the obligor, stating:

(a)  the amount of support debt;

(b)  that it has petitioned the court for an order requiring the obligor to post security; and

(c)  that the obligor has the right to appear before the court and contest the office's or obligee's petition.

(3)  After notice to the obligor and an opportunity for a hearing, the court shall order a bond posted or other security to be deposited upon the office's or obligee's showing of a support debt and of a reasonable basis for the security.



Enacted by Chapter 1, 1988 General Session

